Hawaii statutes.
[§531B-9] Authority to direct and
control disposition; recovery of reasonable expenses. (a) A funeral
director or manager of a funeral establishment, cemetery, mortuary, or
crematory shall have complete authority to direct and control the final disposition
and disposal of a decedent's remains and to proceed under this chapter to
recover reasonable charges for the final disposition and disposal if:

(1) The funeral director or manager:

(A) Has no knowledge that any of the persons
described in section 531B-4(a)(1) through [(a)(10)] exist;

(B) Has knowledge that the person or persons
who may or do have the right of disposition cannot be found after reasonable
inquiry or reasonable attempts to contact; or

(C) Has knowledge that the person or persons
who may or do have the right of disposition have lost this right pursuant to section
531B-6; and

(2) The appropriate public authority fails to assume
responsibility for disposition of the remains within thirty-six hours after
having been given written notice of the decedent's death. Written notice may
be given by hand delivery, certified mail, facsimile transmission, or electronic
mail transmission.

(b) Disposal of the decedent's remains pursuant
to this section shall be by any means that are not prohibited by law. [L 2013,
c 17, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next